Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5051.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
WHEREAS, Throughout the centuries, dedications and memorials have served as tributes
to prominent heroes who have woven the rich fabric or an area or people’s history; and
WHEREAS, Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts is just such a laudable and heroic individual;
and
WHEREAS, Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts, a resident of Newport, Rhode Island and
subsequently Tiverton, Rhode Island, and a member of Alpha Battery, 1st Battalion, 103D Field
Artillery Regiment, 39th Brigade Combat Team in Iraq, made the ultimate sacrifice while engaging
enemy forces in combat operations near Taji, Iraq.
WHEREAS, Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts’ heroic actions resulted in his award of the
Bronze Star Medal, with Combat “V” and the Purple Heart; and
WHEREAS, The State of Rhode Island, as well as the majority of states across the country,
uphold the tradition of naming structures such as roads, bridges and edifices after renowned and
heroic individuals and there is overwhelming support for renaming the Sakonnet River Bridge the
“Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts Sakonnet River Bridge.”
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-157. Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts Sakonnet River Bridge.

Rhode Island Bridge No. 250, which carries Route 24 over the Sakonnet River between the
towns of Portsmouth and Tiverton, previously known as the new Sakonnet River Bridge, shall
hereafter be named and known as the “Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts Sakonnet River Bridge.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000445/SUB A
========
LC000445/SUB A - Page 2 of 3